South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Suspends Section 58-3-20(C) for 2025 SECTION 1. The provision prohibiting the General Assembly from holding an election until a final determination is made by the courts regarding its review of congressional districts' compliance with statutory or constitutional requirements of Section 58-3-20(C) of the S.C. Code is suspended for Calendar Year 2025. Suspends Section 2-20-15 for Public Service Commission member elections for 2025 and 2026 SECTION 2.    Section 2-20-15 of the S.C. Code shall not apply to elections for members of the Public Service Commission conducted by the General Assembly during Calendar Year 2025 and Calendar Year 2026. Effective Date SECTION 3.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of March, 2025. Approved the 7th day of March, 2025. __________